North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-42 Seeds and Crops Inspection and Analysis [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11]

4-42-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-02.
Commissioner — Genetic identity — Physical traits — Analysis and verification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-03.
Inspection and analysis — Procurement of samples. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-04.
Field inspections. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-05.
Inspection and analysis — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-06.
Laboratories and facilities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-07.
Identity preservation — Traceability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-08.
Labels — Documentation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-09.
Contract for services — Protection of growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-10.
Deposit of fees — Investment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-42-11.
Warranties or representations regarding seeds or crops. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.